Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.845

Notification of conviction or guilty plea of certain felony crimes—Transmittal of information to superintendent of public instruction.

(1) Upon a guilty plea or conviction of a person of any felony crime specified under RCW 28A.400.322, the prosecuting attorney shall notify the state patrol of such guilty pleas or convictions.

(2) When the state patrol receives the notice required under subsection (1) of this section, the state patrol shall transmit that information to the superintendent of public instruction. It shall be the duty of the superintendent of public instruction, on at least a quarterly basis, to identify whether the person holds a certificate or permit issued under chapters 28A.405 and 28A.410 RCW or is employed by a school district, and provide this information to the Washington professional educator standards board and the school district employing the person.

[ 2009 c 396 s 8; 2006 c 263 s 828. Prior: 2005 c 421 s 7; 2005 c 237 s 1; 1990 c 33 s 577; 1989 c 320 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1989 c 320: See note following RCW 28A.410.090.